Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
CHAPTER 391 Descent and Distribution

391.010.
Descent of real estate.

When a person having right or title to any real estate or inheritance dies intestate as to such estate, it shall descend in common to his kindred, male and female, in the following order, except as otherwise provided in this chapter:

To his children and their descendants; if there are none, then

To his father and mother, if both are living, one (1) moiety each; but if the father is dead, the mother, if living, shall take the whole estate; if the mother is dead, the whole estate shall pass to the father; if there is no father or mother, then

To his brothers and sisters and their descendants; if there are none, then

To the husband or wife of the intestate; if there are none surviving, then

One (1) moiety of the estate shall pass to the paternal and the other to the maternal kindred, in the following order:

The grandfather and grandmother equally, if both are living; but if one is dead, the entire moiety shall go to the survivor; if there is no grandfather or grandmother, then

To the uncles and aunts and their descendants; if there are none, then

To the great-grandfathers and great-grandmothers, in the same manner prescribed for grandfather and grandmother by subsection (a); if there are none, then

To the brothers and sisters of the grandfathers and grandmothers and their descendants; and so on in other cases without end, passing to the nearest lineal ancestors and their descendants.

If there is no such kindred to one of the parents as is described in subsection (5), the whole to go to the kindred of the other. If there is neither paternal nor maternal kindred, the whole shall go to the kindred of the husband or wife, as if he or she had survived the intestate and died entitled to the estate.

History.

1393: amend. Acts 1956, ch. 132; 1974, ch. 328, § 2.

391.020.
Descent of real estate acquired from parent.

When a person dies intestate and without issue, owning real estate of inheritance which is the gift of either of his parents, the parent who made the gift, if living, shall inherit the whole of such estate.

If a person under the age of eighteen (18) dies without issue, having the title to real estate derived by gift, devise or descent from one of his parents, the whole shall descend to that parent and that parent’s kindred, and if there is none, then in like manner to the other parent and his kindred. The kindred of one parent shall not be so excluded by the kindred of the other parent, if the latter is more remote than the grandfather, grandmother, uncles and aunts of the intestate and their descendants.

History.

1400, 1401: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 100, § 9.

391.030.
Descent of personal property — Exemption for surviving spouse and children — Withdrawal of money from bank by surviving spouse.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, where any person dies intestate as to his or her personal estate, or any part thereof, the surplus, after payment of funeral expenses, charges of administration, and debts, shall pass and be distributed among the same persons, and in the proportions, to whom and in which real estate is directed to descend, except as follows:

The personal estate of an infant shall be distributed as if he or she had died after full age;

An alien may be distributee as though he or she were a citizen; and

Personal property or money on hand or in a bank or other depository to the amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) shall be exempt from distribution and sale and shall be set apart by the District Court having jurisdiction over the estate on application to the surviving spouse, or, if there is no surviving spouse, to the surviving children.

The surviving spouse may, at any time before the property or money is set apart by the court, procure on petition from the Judge of the District Court having jurisdiction over the estate, an order authorizing the surviving spouse to withdraw from any bank or other depository not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) belonging to the estate. Upon presentation of the order, the bank or depository shall permit the surviving spouse to withdraw the sum and shall lodge the order, endorsing thereon the amount withdrawn, with the circuit clerk who shall retain it in the clerk’s files to be considered in connection with further proceedings in the estate and the withdrawal shall be treated as a charge against the property of the estate exempt from distribution.

In the application for the setting apart of property or money under subsection (1) of this section, the surviving spouse or, if there is no surviving spouse, the surviving children may make their selection out of the personal property of the estate to the extent that the value of the property selected does not exceed the amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).

Where any person dies testate:

Personal property or money on hand or in a bank or other depository to the amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) shall be exempt from distribution and sale and shall be set apart by the District Court having jurisdiction over the estate on application of the surviving spouse;

If there is no surviving spouse, personal property or money on hand or in a bank or other depository bequeathed to surviving children to the amount of thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) shall be exempt from distribution and sale and shall be set apart by the District Court having jurisdiction over the estate on application by the surviving children;

The exemption of the surviving spouse under paragraph (a) of this subsection is not conditioned upon the surviving spouse renouncing the will, and, in the event of renunciation, the surviving spouse shall be entitled to the exemption in addition and prior to determining the statutory share of the surviving spouse under KRS

392.080

; and

Subsection (3) of this section shall apply with respect to the surviving spouse provided that the surviving spouse shall first select from among the personal property of the residuary estate, then to the extent necessary from among the money on hand or on deposit specifically bequeathed under the will, and then to the extent necessary from among any other personal property specifically bequeathed under the will. Where the selection of the surviving spouse is made up, in whole or in part, from personal property or money on hand or on deposit specifically bequeathed to a beneficiary, such beneficiary shall have a right of contribution on the principles of KRS

394.420

to

394.490

unless the will otherwise directs, or it is necessarily to be inferred therefrom that the testator intended the same to fall on such beneficiary except that there shall be no right of contribution from the surviving spouse.

History.

1403: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 163; 1966, ch. 255, § 266; 1968, ch. 144, § 1; 1970, ch. 222, § 2; 1972, ch. 168, § 6; 1974, ch. 299, § 2; 1974, ch. 328, § 3; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 10, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 351, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 259, § 8, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 51, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 277, § 7, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 27, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 129, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 2002, ch. 362, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 21, § 9, effective July 15, 2010; 2020 ch. 24, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

391.033.
Limitation on right to estate if parent has abandoned care and maintenance of child.

A parent who has willfully abandoned the care and maintenance of his or her child shall not have a right to intestate succession in any part of the estate and shall not have a right to administer the estate of the child, unless:

The abandoning parent had resumed the care and maintenance at least one (1) year prior to the death of the child and had continued the care and maintenance until the child’s death; or

The parent had been deprived of the custody of his or her child under an order of a court of competent jurisdiction and the parent had substantially complied with all orders of the court requiring contribution to the support of the child.

Any part of a decedent child’s estate prevented from passing to a parent, under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, shall pass through intestate succession as if that parent has failed to survive the decedent child.

This section may be cited as Mandy Jo’s Law.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 414, §§ 1, 3, effective July 14, 2000.

391.035.
District court hearing to determine persons entitled to property passing by intestate succession.

If real or personal property passes by the laws of intestate succession, or under a will to a beneficiary not named in the will, proceedings may be had in the District Court to determine the persons entitled to the property.

If an estate is in process of administration, the executor, administrator, or any person claiming an interest in the property may file a motion in the District Court where administration is in process. If there is no pending administration or administration has been dispensed with, any person claiming an interest in the property may file a motion in the District Court of the county in which the decedent last resided or, if the decedent was not a Kentucky resident, in the District Court of the county in which the property, or the greater part thereof, is located;

The motion shall set forth all of the facts known to the movant relating to the matter, including the names, ages, and addresses of all persons who are or may be entitled to share in the property and their relationship to the decedent or to the class of beneficiaries entitled to share. The motion shall also describe the property under consideration and an estimate of its value;

The motion shall be served in a manner authorized by the Rules of Civil Procedure for the initiation of a civil action and shall set forth the place and time, which shall not be less than twenty (20) days from the date of service, when the motion will come on for hearing.

Upon the hearing on the motion, any person claiming an interest in the property may introduce proof in support of his claim and the court may entertain the admission of any other relevant evidence to aid the court in determining the persons entitled to share in the property.

After hearing all the evidence, the court shall enter judgment in which the names, ages, and addresses of the persons entitled to share in the property are set forth and the proportionate interest of each. The judgment shall be conclusive evidence of the facts determined therein as against all parties, whether known or unknown, to the proceeding.

In a case where some or all of the property is real property located in this state, a certified copy of the judgment shall be recorded in the office of the appropriate county clerk in lieu of the affidavit required by KRS

382.120

. The judgment shall be conclusive evidence of the facts determined therein as against all parties, whether known or unknown, to the proceeding.

Any party may at any time prior to judgment institute an adversary proceeding in Circuit Court pursuant to KRS 24A.120(2).

Any aggrieved party may, no later than thirty (30) days from the date of the judgment, institute an adversary proceeding in Circuit Court pursuant to KRS 24A.120(1)(b).

Any unknown defendants before the court by constructive service alone shall be entitled to the protection afforded by Civil Rule 4.11.

No proceedings under this section shall be conducted by or before a commissioner of the District Court.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1998, ch. 420, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 517, § 10, effective September 1, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 420 and 517 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(6/24/2003). Under the authority of KRS

7.136

, the Reviser of Statutes has changed a reference in subsection (6) of this section from “KRS 24A.120(1)(b)” to “KRS 24A.120(2).”

391.040.
Descendants of distributees take per stirpes.

When any or all of a class first entitled to inherit are dead, leaving descendants, such descendants shall take per stirpes the share of their respective deceased parents.

History.

1394.

391.050.
Collaterals of the halfblood — Inheritance by.

Collaterals of the halfblood shall inherit only half as much as those of the wholeblood, or as ascending kindred, when they take with either.

History.

1395.

391.060.
Title may be inherited through alien.

When title is acquired by descent, it shall be no bar to a person taking title through descent that any ancestor through whom he derives his descent from the intestate is or has been an alien.

History.

1396.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Alien may inherit and pass property by descent, when, KRS

381.290

to

381.340

.

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Schneider, A Kentucky Study of Will Provisions: Implications for Intestate Succession Law, 13 N. Ky. L. Rev. 409 (1987).

391.070.
Posthumous child — Inheritance by.

A child born of a widow, within ten (10) months after the death of the intestate, shall inherit from him in the same manner as if he were in being at the time of the intestate’s death.

History.

1399.

391.080.
Adopted child; inheritance by and from. [Repealed.]

391.090.
Bastards — Inheritance from and by — Effect of marriage of parents. [Repealed.]

391.100.
Children of illegal or void marriages considered as if born in lawful wedlock.

The issue of all illegal or void marriages is considered as if born in lawful wedlock.

History.

2098: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 49, § 5; 1984, ch. 16, § 8, effective July 13, 1984.

391.105.
Determination of rights of intestate succession in the case of a person born out of wedlock.

For the purpose of intestate succession, if a relationship of parent and child must be established to determine succession by, through, or from a person, a person born out of wedlock is a child of the natural mother. That person is also a child of the natural father if:

The natural parents participated in a marriage ceremony before or after the birth of the child, even though the attempted marriage is void; or

In determining the right of the child or its descendants to inherit from or through the father:

There has been an adjudication of paternity before the death of the father; or

There has been an adjudication of paternity after the death of the father based upon clear and convincing proof;

In determining the right of the father or his kindred to inherit from or through the child:

There has been an adjudication of paternity before the death of the child; or

There has been an adjudication of paternity after the death of the child based on clear and convincing proof and the evidence in such adjudication shall have demonstrated that the father openly treated the child as his, and the father did not follow a consistent policy of refusing to support the child on the ground of nonpaternity.

The terms and conditions set out in this section shall also apply in actions brought pursuant to KRS

411.130

and

411.135

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 90, § 3, effective July 15, 1988.

391.110.
Slave marriage valid; issue legitimate. [Repealed.]

391.120.
Descendants have equal rights.

No tenant in common shall have any privilege over another in any election, division or matter to be done or made, concerning lands which have descended to them.

History.

1402.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Bratt, A Primer on Kentucky Intestacy Laws, 82 Ky. L.J. 29 (1993-94).

391.130.
Descendants may recover annuity not fully earned at annuitant’s death.

Whenever any person entitled to an annuity dies within the year, and before the annuity is fully earned, the heirs or personal representative of that person may recover such proportion of the entire amount of the annuity as the time of the year already elapsed at the date of the death of the annuitant bears to the entire year.

History.

2070.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Obligation to person dead at time of execution of obligation may be enforced by representative, KRS

371.060

.

Rent to be apportioned between representative and heirs of landlord who dies before it is due, KRS

395.360

.

391.140.
Advancements — Effect on descendant’s, widow’s, and widower’s share.

Any real or personal property or money, given or devised by a parent or grandparent to a descendant, shall be charged to the descendant or those claiming through him in the division and distribution of the undevised estate of the parent or grandparent. The person to whom the property or money was given or devised shall receive nothing further from the estate until the shares of the other descendants are made proportionately equal with his, according to his descendable and distributable share of the whole estate, real and personal, devised and undevised. The advancement shall be estimated according to the value of the property when given. The maintaining or educating or the giving of money, to a child or grandchild, without any view to a portion or settlement in life, shall not be deemed an advancement.

Advancements made to distributees shall not be taken as a part of the decedent’s personal estate in estimating the distributable share of the widow or widower in the estate.

History.

1407, 1408: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 386, § 76.

391.150.
Contribution.

Contributions shall take place between heirs and distributees on the same principles as between co-obligors.

History.

2080.

391.160.
Authority of life tenant to invade corpus.

If

A devise, bequest, or conveyance of real or personal property is made by written instrument free of any trust; and

By the express terms of the instrument or by rule of law the devise, bequest or conveyance is made to a life tenant with power to consume principal or invade corpus, with the remainder to another upon the death of the life tenant; and

The instrument does not expressly state the purpose for or the extent to which the life tenant may consume principal or invade corpus, then the provisions of subsection (2) shall apply.

The life tenant’s power to consume principal or invade corpus shall be limited to such consumption or invasion as shall be necessary for his health, education (including college and professional education), and support in his accustomed manner of living.

If

A devise, bequest, or conveyance of real or personal property is made in trust by written instrument; and

By the express terms of the trust instrument or by rule of law the devise, bequest or conveyance is made for the benefit of a tenant for life with power in the trustee to consume principal or invade corpus for the benefit of the life tenant, with remainder to another upon the death of the life tenant; and

The instrument does not expressly state the purpose for or the extent to which the trustee may consume principal or invade corpus for the benefit of the life tenant, then the provisions of subsection (4) shall apply.

The trustee’s power to consume principal or invade corpus for the benefit of the life tenant shall be limited to such consumption or invasion as shall be necessary for his health, education (including college and professional education), and support in his accustomed manner of living.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 299, § 12.

391.170.
Commercial rights to use of names and likenesses of public figures.

The General Assembly recognizes that a person has property rights in his name and likeness which are entitled to protection from commercial exploitation. The General Assembly further recognizes that although the traditional right of privacy terminates upon death of the person asserting it, the right of publicity, which is a right of protection from appropriation of some element of an individual’s personality for commercial exploitation, does not terminate upon death.

The name or likeness of a person who is a public figure shall not be used for commercial profit for a period of fifty (50) years from the date of his death without the written consent of the executor or administrator of his estate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 263, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.